Utah statutes.
13-49-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Client" means a person who receives services from or enters into an agreement to receive services from an immigration consultant.

(2)  "Compensation" means anything of economic value that is paid, loaned, granted, given, donated, or transferred to a person for or in consideration of:

(a)  services;

(b)  personal or real property; or

(c)  another thing of value.

(3)  "Department" means the Department of Commerce.

(4)  "Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection in the department.

(5)  "Immigration consultant" means a person who provides nonlegal assistance or advice on an immigration matter including:

(a)  completing a document provided by a federal or state agency, but not advising a person as to the person's answers on the document;

(b)  translating a person's answer to a question posed in a document provided by a federal or state agency;

(c)  securing for a person supporting documents, such as a birth certificate, that may be necessary to complete a document provided by a federal or state agency;

(d)  submitting a completed document on a person's behalf and at the person's request to the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services; and

(e)  referring a person to a person who could undertake legal representation activities in an immigration matter.

(6)  "Immigration matter" means a proceeding, filing, or action affecting the immigration or citizenship status of a person that arises under:

(a)  immigration and naturalization law;

(b)  executive order or presidential proclamation; or

(c)  action of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, the United States Department of State, or the United States Department of Labor.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 2012 General Session

